apertium-qwh.qwh.twol
Alphabet
 A B C D E Ä F G H I J K L M N Ň O Ö P R S T U Ü W Y X Z
 a b c d e ä f g h i j k l m n ň o ö p r s t u ü w y x z
%{A%}:a %>:0
%{n%}:n %{n%}:0
! %{N%}:n %{N%}:0 %{N%}:i %{N%}:y
%{I%}:i %{I%}:y %{I%}:0
%{V%}:u %{V%}:i %{V%}:o %{V%}:a %{V%}:0
%{i%}:i %{i%}:0
%{i2%}:i %{i2%}:0



 ;

Sets

Vowel = A E Ä I O Ö U Ü 
        a e ä i o ö u ü   ;

Consonant =   B C D F G H J K L M N Ň P R S T W Y X Z
              b c d f g h j k l m n ň p r s t w y x z  ;

Rules

 "Remove i with vowel-ending stem"
  i:0 <=> Vowel %>: {n}: _ ;

! properly format : {i}:0 <=> :Vow%>: {N}: ({i}) _ ;

! call something i2


! "first person possessed form"
! %{N%}:Vy <=> :Vx %>: _ ;
!      where Vx in Vowel
!            Vy in Vowel
!      matched;

"make [i] match the behavior of [n]"
%{i%}:0 <=> :Vowel %>: %{n%}: _ ;

! "keep n after long vowel"
! %{N%}:n <=> :Consonant %>: _ ;
!            :Vowel :Vowel %>: _ ;

"delete [n] after short vowel"
 %{n%}:0 <=> :Vowel %>: _ ;



! "delete [i]"
! %{i%}:0 <=> \:Vowel :Vowel %>: %{N%} (%{i%}:) _ ;

"Lengthen [A] before consonant"
%{A%}:a <=> _ :Consonant ;


! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
